Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 14.1 Legislative Oversight Commission for Consulting Contracts

22-14.1-1.
Establishment — Purpose — Membership — Compensation.

There is established an oversight commission empowered to conduct evaluations and reviews of any and all consulting contracts entered into by and or on behalf of the state or any subdivisions or entities of the state. The reviews and evaluations shall include, but not be limited to, the following as objectives:

The elimination of duplicative, inefficient, unnecessary or ineffective use of outside consulting contracts by different portions of government;

The efficient use of outside consultants by the state;

To promote uniformity in the administration of various programs which require the use of outside consultants.

The commission shall consist of seven (7) members: three (3) of whom shall be members of the house finance committee of the house of representatives, two (2) of whom shall be appointed by the speaker and one of whom shall be appointed by the minority leader; three (3) of whom shall be members of the senate finance committee of the senate, two (2) of whom shall be appointed by the president of the senate and one of whom shall be appointed by the minority leader, and one of whom shall be the auditor general, or his designee.

The legislative members shall serve a term of two (2) years. The members shall annually elect one of them as chairperson of the commission.

Any vacancy on the commission, occurring for any reason prior to the expiration of the term, including, but not limited to, termination of active membership in the general assembly, shall be filled for the unexpired term by the appointing authority in the same manner as the original appointment.

Any member of the commission may, for cause, be summarily removed from office by the appointing authority, which removal shall be subject to judicial review by the superior court, and pending that review the member shall not carry out any duties as a commission member.

The members of the commission shall receive no salaries but shall be allowed reasonable expenses in the performance of their official duties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 41, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 35.